dix/not-common-apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
    <pardef n="d/o__vaŭ">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oes</l> 
        <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>id</l> 
        <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vi</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e c="para las reglas de agradar del t2x, por el momento">
      <p>
        <l>li</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>li</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ŝi</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ĝi</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ni</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ili</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="si__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="probj__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>min</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ŝin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ĝin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>onin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ilin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="probj_dem__prn">
    <e>
        <i></i> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>me</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>you</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>him</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>her</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>it</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>us</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>them</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>this</l> 
        <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>these</l> 
        <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>that</l> 
        <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>those</l> 
        <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ake__vblex__sep">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ake</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ake</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>akes</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ook</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aken</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aking</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aking</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aking</l> 
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="politics__n__unc">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="occur__vblex__sep">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>red</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>red</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ring</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ring</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ring</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mon/ey__n__unc">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ey</l> 
        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eys</l> 
        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ies</l> 
        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="liv/e__vblex__sep">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="pronoms personals de subjecte">
        <i></i> 
        <par n="prsubj__prn" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pronoms personals d'objecte">
        <i></i> 
        <par n="probj__prn" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sin">
        <i>sin</i> 
        <par n="si__prn" /> 
    </e>
